Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.440

Federal waivers.

Where feasible, the department of children, youth, and families shall apply for federal waivers that would reimburse the department for the cost of providing maintenance payments for relatives or other suitable persons caring for a child who have indicated a desire to become a licensed foster parent, provided that the person has received an initial license from the department.

[ 2021 c 211 s 11.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—Intent—2021 c 211: See notes following RCW 13.34.040.